Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 5. Employer Contributions

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

76 Am. Jur. 2d Unemployment Compensation §§ 19 to 42.

§ 27-3-501.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Benefit ratio” means the quotient of total benefits charged to an employer’s account and paid during the preceding experience period divided by total taxable wages payable by the employer for that experience period excluding any portion of wages for which contributions were not paid as of July 31 of the preceding calendar year;

“Experience period” means the thirty-six (36) consecutive month period or, in the case of a new employer not previously subject to this act the twenty-four (24) consecutive month period, ending June 30 of the preceding year;

“Ineffectively charged benefits” means benefits charged to an employer’s experience rating account after benefits previously charged to his account qualified him for the maximum rate of contributions;

“Noncharged benefits” means benefits not charged to an employer’s experience rating account pursuant to W.S. 27-3-504(e) and 27-3-608(b);

“Nonprofit organization” means an organization defined by 26 U.S.C. 501(c)(3) and exempt from federal income tax under 26 U.S.C. 501(a);

“Organization” means a hospital, institution of higher education, this state or any political subdivision, an Indian tribe as defined under section 3306 of the federal Unemployment Tax Act and a group of organizations established pursuant to regulations of the commission for purposes of joint accounts, employing services qualifying as employment under W.S. 27-3-105(a)(i);

“Client” means any entity that utilizes one (1) or more workers that have been contracted for and supplied by a service supplier. The client has the right to control the manner and means of the workers performing services for it;

“Service supplier” means any entity that is primarily engaged in the business of contracting with the client to provide one (1) or more workers to perform services for the client and performs all of the following functions:

Assigns the worker to perform services for the client;

Sets the rate of pay of the worker, whether or not through negotiations;

Pays the worker directly;

Retains the authority to assign or refuse to assign a worker to other clients if the worker is unacceptable to a specific client;

Determines assignments of workers even though the worker may retain the right to refuse specific assignments;

Negotiates with the client on matters of time, place, type of work, working conditions, quality and price of the service.

“Temporary service contractor” means any individual, firm, association, partnership, limited liability company, corporation or other type of organization conducting a business that employs individuals directly for the purpose of furnishing services of the employed individuals on a temporary basis to others. “Temporary service contract” does not include a service supplier as defined in paragraph (viii) of this subsection;

“Temporary worker” means a worker whose services are furnished to another employer on a temporary basis to substitute for a permanent employee on leave or to meet an emergency or short-term workload need. “Temporary worker” does not include a person working for a service supplier as defined in paragraph (viii) of this subsection;

For purposes of W.S.

27-3-507

and

27-3-706

, “person” means an individual or entity, including any partnership, association, trust, estate, corporation, limited liability company, domestic or foreign insurance company or corporation, a receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, trustee, successor or the legal representative of a deceased person.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 7; 1939, ch. 124, § 11; 1943, ch. 58, § 5; 1945, ch. 81, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 54-107; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 6 to 9; 1953, ch. 111, §§ 5 to 7; 1957, ch. 88, §§ 6, 7; W.S. 1957, § 27-28; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 9, 10; 1965, ch. 186, § 1; 1967, ch. 215, § 2; 1969, ch. 59, § 1; 1971, ch. 253, §§ 9, 16; 1973, ch. 79, § 1; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-108

; Laws 1979, ch. 51, § 1; ch. 141, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 133, § 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2; 1985, ch. 175, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 2001, ch. 67, § 1; 2005, ch. 186, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (a)(ix) through (a)(xi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Unemployment Tax Act. —

Section 3306 of the federal Unemployment Tax Act appears as 26 U.S.C. § 3306.

Tax imposed by Unemployment Compensation Act is an excise tax.

Unemployment Compensation Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1943).

Limitation on amount of tax. —

Since unemployment tax or charge imposed upon employers is imposed for specific ultimate purpose, it should be limited to amount reasonably sufficient, and sufficient only, to accomplish that purpose. Unemployment Compensation Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1943).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Incidence of unemployment compensation upon employer, where, during the base year, employee worked in different states for same employer, 9 ALR2d 646.

Service charges made by hotels or restaurants and later distributed to waiters or similar employees as “wages” upon which state unemployment taxes or contributions are required to be paid, 83 ALR2d 1024.

Liability of political party or its subdivision for contributions under unemployment compensation acts, 43 ALR3d 1351.

Repayment of unemployment compensation benefits erroneously paid, 90 ALR3d 987.

§ 27-3-502.
Determination of employer and employment; election of coverage; records and reports; injunction; service suppliers.

Upon its own motion or application of an employing unit and after notice and opportunity for hearing, the department may determine if an employing unit is an employer and if services performed for the employing unit qualify as employment. The department shall consider employment occurring during a ten (10) year period preceding the date of employer determination. A determination by the department is final as to the employing unit fifteen (15) days after mailing its findings and determination to the employing unit. The employing unit may appeal a determination in accordance with W.S.

27-3-506

.

Except as provided by subsection (d) of this section, an employing unit qualifying as an employer within any year is subject to this act for that entire calendar year.

An employer enumerated under this subsection may apply in writing to the department before January 31 for termination of coverage under this act for that calendar year. The department may waive the application filing requirement for good cause. Employers to which this subsection applies include:

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 73, § 3.

An agricultural employer paying wages of less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) each quarter during the preceding calendar year or employing less than ten (10) workers on any day of twenty (20) or more different weeks within a calendar year;

A domestic employer paying wages of less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) in each quarter of the preceding calendar year;

A nonprofit organization paying wages for less than four (4) individuals or for less than twenty (20) weeks in the preceding year.

An employing unit not qualifying as an employer or for which services not qualifying as employment are performed may elect coverage under this act for a period of not less than two (2) years by filing written notice of its election with the department. If the department approves the election in writing, coverage is effective on the date of approval. Application for termination of coverage as an employer under this subsection shall be filed in writing with the department not less than thirty (30) days before January 1 of any year following the initial two (2) years of coverage and for termination of coverage of employment, not less than thirty (30) days after January 1. The department may terminate coverage under this subsection for good cause by giving notice to the employer.

An employing unit shall maintain accurate employment records containing information prescribed by the commission. Records shall be open to inspection by and submitted to the department upon request. An employing unit shall submit reports on employees upon request of the department or an appeal tribunal.

Any employing unit subject to this act shall not commence business or engage in work within this state without registering under this act and otherwise complying with this act. A prime or general contractor subcontracting any part of a contract shall require notification and compliance by any subcontractor under this subsection before awarding a contract or permitting a subcontractor to begin work. The state, a county, municipality or any other political subdivision shall require the prime or general contractor to register and comply with this act before authorizing the contractor to begin work under any public contract. The secretary of state shall report to the department the names and addresses of all business entities registering with that agency during the preceding month. The Wyoming department of transportation and the department of administration and information shall report to the department the names and addresses of business entities awarded a contract by that agency during the preceding month. Any employing unit failing to comply with this subsection or W.S.

27-3-510

(c) or (d) or delinquent for filing reports or paying contributions required under this act may be enjoined by the department from engaging or continuing in business subject to this act until required reports are filed or payments are made and the unit otherwise complies with this act. All costs of the action including a reasonable attorney fee shall be paid by the employing unit against which the injunction is sought. In addition to the penalties and remedies provided by W.S.

27-3-510

through

27-3-512

and

27-3-704

, the department may assess and collect an additional fee of up to three (3) times the amount of delinquent contributions payable under this act for any employing unit failing to comply with this subsection. This additional fee is part of the payment due for all purposes if an action is instituted under this subsection. If the employing unit is a subcontractor, the general contractor or the project owner may be held liable for payment of the contributions and any additional assessment due.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this act:

A service supplier is the employing unit of the worker provided to the client and shall be liable to pay the contributions on wages paid by it to the worker performing services for the client;

If an entity is not a service supplier as defined by W.S. 27-3-501(a)(viii) or if the client pays wages to the worker directly, then the client is the employing unit of the worker and shall be liable to pay the contributions on wages paid by it to the worker performing services for the client;

Notwithstanding the foregoing, if an entity pays the worker and that entity is not the employing unit of the worker as determined herein, that entity is deemed the agent of the employing unit so determined;

If the service supplier fails to pay all contributions or submit required reports which are due, then the client shall be jointly and severally liable for those which are attributable to wages for services performed for the client by the worker provided by the service supplier;

The service supplier shall keep separate records, submit a list of all clients to the department on a quarterly basis and submit separate quarterly reports for each client;

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 177, § 2.

A temporary service contractor is the employing unit of the temporary worker provided to an employer and shall be liable to pay the contributions on wages paid by the temporary service contractor to the temporary worker performing services for the employer.

If an employing unit fails to comply with an injunction order issued under subsection (f) of this section, the department may file with the district court of the county in which the employing unit resides, conducts business or may be found, a verified application showing that the employing unit received notice of an injunction order and has failed to comply with its terms. Upon receipt of the department’s application, the court shall provide the employing unit with an opportunity for a hearing within twenty (20) days. Upon finding that the employing unit has violated the department’s injunction, the court may issue an order directing the employing unit, including any partners or corporate officers, to comply with the injunction order and may assess a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) per day for each day of violation. Any officer or director having at least twenty percent (20%) ownership interest of a corporate employing unit, who controls or supervises filing contribution reports or making payment contributions under this act and who willfully fails to file the reports or make required payments, may be held jointly and severally liable for the contributions and interest due from the employing unit. In any court proceeding for the enforcement of an injunction order, the department shall not be required to show that it lacks adequate legal remedy or is suffering irreparable harm due to the violation of the injunction order. Any employing unit failing to comply with an order of the court issued under this subsection may be cited for contempt.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, §§ 8, 11; 1939, ch. 124, §§ 12, 15; 1941, ch. 96, §§ 7, 10; 1943, ch. 58, § 6; 1945, ch. 81, § 8; C.S. 1945, §§ 54-108, 54-111; Laws 1949, ch. 49, § 11; W.S. 1957, §§ 27-30, 27-33; Laws 1967, ch. 71, § 1; 1971, ch. 253, § 16; 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1977, ch. 156, § 2; W.S. 1977, §§ 27-3-110, 27-3-113; Laws 1979, ch. 141, § 1; 1981, ch. 133, § 1; 1982, ch. 55, § 1; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1984, ch. 50, § 2; 1987, ch. 130, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1991, ch. 174, § 2; ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 76, § 1; 1995, ch. 121, § 2; 1999, ch. 73, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 186, § 2; 2007, ch. 177, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (g)(vii).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, repealed former (g)(vi), which read: “If the service supplier fails to pay all contributions or submit required reports which are due, then the client shall be jointly and severally liable for those which are attributable to wages for services performed for the client by the worker provided by the service supplier.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Quoted

in

Employment Sec. Comm'n v. Laramie Cabs, Inc., 700 P.2d 399,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 489

(Wyo. 1985); Wyo. Dep't of Empl. v. Jolley, Castillo, Drennon, Ltd., 2010 WY 48, 229 P.3d 955,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Apr. 22, 2010).

Stated

in

Hupp v. Employment Sec. Comm'n, 715 P.2d 223,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 500

(Wyo. 1986).

Cited

in

General Chem. Corp. v. Unemployment Ins. Comm'n, 902 P.2d 716,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1995).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of successor in business to experience or rating of predecessor for purpose of fixing rate of unemployment compensation contributions, 22 ALR2d 673.

§ 27-3-503.
Payment; base rate; failure to pay; rate variations; benefit ratio; new employer rate; special reserve rate.

Employment wage contributions imposed under this section are payable by employers subject to this act. Contributions shall be paid to the department for the fund in accordance with regulations of the commission and shall not be deducted from employee wages.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the base rate of contributions assigned to any employer is eight and one-half percent (8.5%) for 1988 and each calendar year thereafter subject to rate variations under subsections (d) and (f) of this section in addition to the adjustment factors computed under W.S.

27-3-505

. Except as hereafter provided, a contributing employer failing to pay all contributions, interest and penalties or to submit all quarterly contribution reports due on his account or any account assumed under W.S.

27-3-507

on or before September 30 preceding the effective date of his assigned rate shall be assigned a delinquent rate which shall include a two percent (2%) tax rate increase in his base rate and shall also include in addition thereto the adjustment factors for the next calendar year beginning January 1. The delinquent rate shall not exceed the maximum assignable rate. The delinquent rate shall continue to be assigned through and including the calendar quarter in which the delinquent employer satisfies his delinquent account by paying all contributions, interest and penalties due and submitting all contribution reports due. Upon satisfaction of the delinquent account, the contributing employer shall be assigned the contribution rate otherwise applicable under this article beginning the next full calendar quarter. Provided however, that a delinquent employer shall pay an assigned delinquent rate for at least the first quarter even if the account is satisfied before January 1 of the new calendar year.

Upon reviewing the account of a delinquent employer, the department may eliminate or reduce contributions payable due to the two percent (2%) delinquency tax rate increase imposed under subsection (b) of this section either upon a showing of good cause, or a finding that:

The delinquency is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00);

After notice of the changed rate, the employer protested his delinquency tax rate in writing to the department pursuant to W.S. 27-3-506(b);

All delinquent amounts are paid by December 31 preceding the calendar year for which the delinquent rate has been assigned; and

All delinquent wage records are submitted.

Rate variations from the base rate of contributions based upon the employer’s benefit ratio shall be assigned to eligible employers each calendar year.

Benefit ratios shall be computed for those employers whose accounts have been chargeable for benefits throughout the employer’s experience period. An employer’s benefit ratio shall be the contribution rate provided his rate is not more than eight and one-half percent (8.5%) in addition to the adjustment factors computed under W.S.

27-3-505

. Benefit ratios shall be computed to the fourth decimal on the basis of the experience period preceding the calculation date of the rate.

Any new employer not previously subject to this act or having no established experience period shall pay contributions at a rate equal to the average rate of contributions paid by his major industrial classification for the calendar year preceding the year in which he first employed workers in this state in addition to the adjustment factors computed under W.S.

27-3-505

. In no case, however, will any new employer be assigned a rate of less than one percent (1%), plus the adjustment factors computed under W.S.

27-3-505

. This rate shall be adjusted annually and the rate shall remain in effect until the employer has established an experience period in accordance with this article. The commission shall by rule and regulation develop the major industrial classifications for the state and the department shall annually determine the contribution rate for each classification based upon contributions paid during the preceding calendar year.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 123, § 3.

Any employer subject to this act solely due to having met the liability requirements under W.S. 27-3-105(a)(ii), 27-3-107(c) or (g) for the first time during the preceding calendar year shall be exempt from the delinquent rate provisions in subsection (b) of this section for the subsequent year, provided the employer has submitted all reports and contributions by April 30 of the subsequent year.

Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, upon full satisfaction of an employer’s delinquent account and at the written request of the employer, the department may, for good cause shown, reduce or eliminate the additional amounts payable as a result of the two percent (2%) delinquency rate.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 7; 1939, ch. 124, § 11; 1943, ch. 58, § 5; 1945, ch. 81, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 54-107; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 6 to 9; 1953, ch. 111, §§ 5 to 7; 1957, ch. 88, §§ 6, 7; W.S. 1957, § 27-28; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 9, 10; 1965, ch. 186, § 1; 1967, ch. 215, § 2; 1969, ch. 59, § 1; 1971, ch. 253, §§ 9, 16; 1973, ch. 79, § 1; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-108

; Laws 1979, ch. 51, § 1; ch. 141, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 133, § 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2; 1984, ch. 50, § 2; 1985, ch. 175, § 1; 1986, ch. 101, § 1; 1987, ch. 130, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1997, ch. 168, § 2; 2001, ch. 148, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 74, § 1; 2003, ch. 73, § 1; ch. 123, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 72, § 1; 2007, ch. 177, § 1; 2017 ch. 102, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

As to the state unemployment insurance trust fund, see §

27-3-209

.

The 2003 amendment,

effective January 1, 2004, in (b), (e) and (f) deleted “a special reserve contribution rate assigned under subsection (g) of this section and” or a variant; also in (b), rewrote the third sentence; and repealed former (g), pertaining to a special reserve rate.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (j).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b), deleted the second sentence regarding the base rate for any employer for the 2003 calendar year; inserted “paying all contributions, interest and penalties due and,” and deleted “payments and” preceding “contribution reports due.”

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (c), substituted “the department may eliminate or reduce contributions payable due to the two percent (2%) delinquency tax rate increase imposed under subsection (b) of this section either upon a showing of good cause, or a finding” for “the department may collect up to double the tax due plus interest in lieu of the delinquency rate if it finds”; in (c)(i), substituted “the delinquency is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “the delinquency and interest is less than two hundred dollars ($200.00)”; in (c)(iii), substituted “All delinquent amounts are paid” for “The delinquent contributions and interest are paid”; added (c)(iv); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Applied

in

Wyoming Dep't of Emp. v. Wyoming Restaurant Assocs., 859 P.2d 1281,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1993); General Chem. Corp. v. Unemployment Ins. Comm'n, 902 P.2d 716,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1995).

Stated

in

Graves v. Utah Power & Light Co., 713 P.2d 187,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 454

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 27-3-504.
Separate employer's accounts; charging of accounts; when accounts not charged.

Separate accounts shall be maintained for each employer and benefits paid to an individual shall be charged to the account of his base period employer.

If an individual is employed by two (2) or more employers during his base period, the base period employer’s account shall be charged an amount bearing the same ratio to total benefits paid to the individual as the amount of wages payable by the employer bears to total wages payable by all employers during the individual’s base period.

Benefits paid to an individual by this state pursuant to a wage-combining arrangement under W.S. 27-3-608(b) and attributable in part to wages and employment covered by this act shall be charged in accordance with this section to the account of that individual’s base period employer. If, however, the benefits are paid by another state, the amount chargeable to employers in this state for whom the individual was previously employed, shall be the amount reimbursed by this state to the paying state. The amount chargeable to employers in this state shall be an amount bearing the same ratio of total wages payable by all employers in this state during the individual’s base period.

If extended benefits are paid under W.S.

27-3-314

to an individual employed during his base period by an organization defined under W.S. 27-3-501(a)(vi) and the organization is subject to W.S.

27-3-503

, one-half (1/2) of the extended benefits attributable to employment by the organization shall be charged to its account.

Benefits shall not be charged to an employer’s account if:

They are paid in error;

The individual receiving benefits voluntarily leaves work without good cause attributable to employment or was discharged from employment for misconduct in connection with this work, provided however, that chargeability of an employer’s account for benefits paid to a claimant in a particular benefit year shall be based solely on the last separation that occurred before the filing of the claimant’s claim for which the claimant is monetarily eligible and shall not be affected by a separation that occurs after the filing of the initial claim and during the benefit year;

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 50, § 3.

The base period employer provided part-time employment and during the individual’s current benefit year provides the same number of hours and wages provided during the base period. If the hours or wages are reduced during the current benefit year or the individual is terminated from part-time employment for reasons other than those specified under paragraph (ii) of this subsection, the employer’s account shall be charged pursuant to this section;

They are paid for an extended benefit period pursuant to W.S.

27-3-314

, except as provided by subsection (d) of this section;

An individual receives benefits under this act for unemployment resulting directly from a major disaster declared by the United States President under 42 U.S.C. § 5122(2) and the individual is otherwise eligible for federal disaster unemployment assistance;

The individual receiving benefits is enrolled in an approved program pursuant to W.S.

27-3-307

;

An individual receives benefits under this act for unemployment resulting directly from the reinstatement of another employee upon that employee’s completion of service in the uniformed services, as provided in W.S. 19-11-103(a)(ix) and 38 U.S.C. 4303(13).

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 222, §§ 2, 3.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 7; 1939, ch. 124, § 11; 1943, ch. 58, § 5; 1945, ch. 81, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 54-107; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 6 to 9; 1953, ch. 111, §§ 5 to 7; 1957, ch. 88, §§ 6, 7; W.S. 1957, § 27-28; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 9, 10; 1965, ch. 186, § 1; 1967, ch. 215, § 2; 1969, ch. 59, § 1; 1971, ch. 253, §§ 9, 16; 1973, ch. 79, § 1; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-108

; Laws 1979, ch. 51, § 1; ch. 141, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 133, § 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1984, ch. 50, §§ 2, 3; 1985, ch. 175, § 1; 1987, ch. 130, § 1; 1989, ch. 222, §§ 2, 3; 1991, ch. 83, § 1; 1999, ch. 73, § 2; 2004, ch. 86, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the state unemployment insurance trust fund, see §

27-3-209

.

As to employment support fund, see §

27-3-211

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (e)(viii).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-3-103

.

Applicability. —

Laws 2020, 1st Sp. Sess., Ch. 2, § 6, provides:“ (a) In addition to the list of benefits that shall not be charged to an employer's unemployment compensation account under
W.S. 27-3-504(e), no benefits shall be charged to an employer's unemployment compensation account if the governor, by executive order outlining the basis for the order and with the adoption of adequate standards and safeguards to assure the continued actuarial soundness of the unemployment compensation fund, determines that the charges should not be charged due to circumstances related to the unique coronavirus COVID-19.

“(b) Notwithstanding contribution requirements under the Wyoming Employment Security Law,
W.S.

27-3-101

through

27-3-706

, the department of workforce services may grant an employer that is current on its required contributions under the Wyoming Employment Security Law a delay in the payment of contributions. The department may promulgate rules to grant a delay in payment of contributions under this subsection for any duration that will maintain the solvency of the unemployment compensation program and to the extent that funding is made available through the Coronavirus Aid, Relief and Economic Security (CARES) Act, P.L. 116-136, or from any other available federal funds related to the COVID-19 emergency response, to offset the delayed contributions.”

Conditional offer. —

The worker never was employed by company for purposes of the Wyoming Employment Security Law because company stated unambiguously in its Drug and Alcohol Policy that it did not hire applicants who tested positively for drugs. Where the worker accepted the company's conditional offer, and submitted to the drug test, certainly with foreknowledge that the result would be positive, public policy should not permit the worker to claim the benefits of unemployment insurance. In re Sierra Trading Post, 996 P.2d 1144,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 2000).

Quoted

in

General Chem. Corp. v. Unemployment Ins. Comm'n, 902 P.2d 716,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 172

(Wyo. 1995).

Stated

in

Graves v. Utah Power & Light Co., 713 P.2d 187,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 454

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 27-3-505.
Adjustment for noncharged and ineffectively charged benefits; adjustment for positive and negative fund balance; computations; exception; maximum rate.

An adjustment factor for noncharged and ineffectively charged benefits shall be computed to the fourth decimal by dividing the total noncharged and ineffectively charged benefits to all employers’ experience rating accounts during the experience rating period ending June 30 by the total taxable wages payable during the experience period and added to the rate provided by W.S.

27-3-503

. The total taxable wages payable under this subsection shall not include wages payable by employers electing payments instead of contributions under W.S.

27-3-509

. Sixty percent (60%) of this adjustment factor shall be allocated to the unemployment compensation fund. Forty percent (40%) of this adjustment factor shall be allocated to the employment support fund created by W.S.

27-3-211

.

If the fund balance on October 31 of the year immediately preceding the calendar year for which the contribution rate is being computed is less than three and one-half percent (3 1/2%) of the total payrolls reported to the department by September 30 for that year ending June 30, a positive fund balance adjustment factor shall be computed. The adjustment factor shall be computed annually to the fourth decimal by dividing the total reported taxable payrolls for the year ending June 30 of the year immediately preceding the calendar year for which the contribution rate is being computed, into a sum equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the difference between the amount in the fund on October 31 of the same year and five percent (5%) of the total payrolls for that year ending June 30. The adjustment factor shall be effective until the fund balance on October 31 of the year immediately preceding the effective date of the contribution rate equals three and one-half percent (3 1/2%) or more of the total payrolls for that year ending June 30. The department shall by rule and regulation establish an additional formula to apportion the positive fund balance adjustment factor between those employers whose accounts have incurred a benefit ratio, pursuant to W.S. 27-3-503(e), of zero (0) and those employers whose accounts have incurred a benefit ratio that is greater than zero (0). For purposes of the apportionment, those employers having no established experience period pursuant to W.S. 27-3-503(f) shall be treated the same as those employers whose accounts have incurred a benefit ratio that is greater than zero (0). The apportionment formula shall reflect:

The proportion of contribution revenue received from each of the two (2) groups of employers during the previous calendar year;

An additional surcharge for employers whose accounts have incurred a benefit ratio that is greater than zero (0).

If the fund balance on October 31 of the year immediately preceding the calendar year for which the contribution rate is being computed exceeds four percent (4%) of the total payrolls reported to the department by September 30 for that year ending June 30, a negative fund balance adjustment factor shall be computed. The negative adjustment factor shall be computed annually to the fourth decimal by dividing the total reported taxable payrolls for the year ending June 30 of the year immediately preceding the calendar year for which the contribution rate is being computed, into a sum equal to twenty-five percent (25%) of the difference between the amount in the fund as of October 31 of the same year and four percent (4%) of the total payrolls for that year ending June 30. The adjustment factor shall be effective until the fund balance on October 31 of the year immediately preceding the effective date of the contribution rate is equal to or less than four percent (4%) of the total payrolls for that year ending June 30.

The adjustment factors computed pursuant to this section are separate from an employer’s experience rating, shall be algebraically added to the employer’s contribution rate and payable by each employer subject to this article. The adjustment factor computed under subsection (c) of this section shall be algebraically added only to the contribution rate of those employers eligible for an experience rating. The adjustment factors applied to an employer’s contribution rate shall not be less than zero (0).

Repealed by Laws 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 3.

For purposes of this section, the fund balance includes any amount credited to the state unemployment insurance trust fund pursuant to W.S. 27-3-202(b) but does not include any amount credited to Wyoming’s account in the unemployment trust fund pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1103 and appropriated for administrative expenses.

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 50, § 3.

Effective for the period beginning January 1, 1991, the adjustment factors computed under subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not exceed one and five-tenths percent (1.5%) to be chargeable against employers.

History.

Laws 1937, ch. 113, § 7; 1939, ch. 124, § 11; 1943, ch. 58, § 5; 1945, ch. 81, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 54-107; Laws 1949, ch. 49, §§ 6 to 9; 1953, ch. 111, §§ 5 to 7; 1957, ch. 88, §§ 6, 7; W.S. 1957, § 27-28; Laws 1963, ch. 121, §§ 9, 10; 1965, ch. 186, § 1; 1967, ch. 215, § 2; 1969, ch. 59, § 1; 1971, ch. 253, §§ 9, 16; 1973, ch. 79, § 1; 1977, ch. 156, § 1; ch. 159, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

27-3-108

; Laws 1979, ch. 51, § 1; ch. 141, §§ 1, 2; 1981, ch. 133, § 2; 1983, ch. 114, § 1; 1983, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, §§ 2, 3; 1984, ch. 50, §§ 2, 3; 1990, ch. 50, § 1; ch. 63, § 2; 1991, ch. 82, § 1; 1997, ch. 168, § 2; 1999, ch. 159, § 2; 2003, ch. 123, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 144, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the state unemployment insurance trust fund, see §

27-3-209

.

The 2003 amendment,

effective January 1, 2004, substituted “Sixty percent (60 %)” for “Eighty percent (80 %)” and “Forty percent (40 %)” for “Twenty percent (20 %)” in (a); in (c) twice substituted “four percent (4 %)” for “five percent (5 %)” and substituted “contribution rate is equal to or less than four percent (4 %)” for “contribution rate is less than five percent (5 %) and more than four percent (4 %)”; and rewrote the final sentence in (d).

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (b), inserted the last sentence and added (i) and (ii).